Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2310.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "The Matthew O'Gara Act
of 2026."
SECTION 2. Section 31-26-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-26 entitled "Accidents
and Accident Reports" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-26-1. Duty to stop in accidents resulting in personal injury Duty to stop in accidents
resulting in personal injury -- The Matthew O'Gara Act of 2026.
(a) The driver of any vehicle knowingly involved in an accident resulting in injury to,
serious bodily injury to, or death of any person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of
the accident or as close to it as possible, but shall then immediately return to and in every event
shall remain at the scene of the accident until he or she has fulfilled the requirements of § 31-26-
3. A stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.
(b) Any person knowingly failing to stop or to comply with the requirements under
circumstances which result in injury to any person shall upon conviction be punished by a
mandatory loss of license for at least one year and not more than five (5) ten (10) years and
imprisonment for not less than eighteen (18) months and not more than five (5) ten (10) years,
and/or fined plus a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(c)(1) Any person knowingly failing to stop or to comply with the requirements under
circumstances which result in serious bodily injury to any person shall upon conviction be punished

as follows:
(i) Every person convicted of a first violation shall be punished by imprisonment for not
less than one year eighteen (18) months and for not more than ten (10) years and by a fine of not
less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The
sentencing judge shall have the discretion to sentence the person to any unit of the adult correctional
institutions. Additionally, the license of the person shall be revoked for a period of up to at least
two (2) years and not more than ten (10) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until
evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no
grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue a license and until the person gives proof of
financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.
(ii) For a second or subsequent conviction under this subsection within a five (5) year
period, a person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two (2) years nor more than
fifteen (15) years and by a fine of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000). The sentencing judge shall have the discretion to sentence the person
to any unit of the adult correctional institutions. Additionally, the license of the person shall be
revoked for a period of up to at least four (4) years and not more than fifteen (15) years. The license
privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of
motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize refusal to issue a license
and until the person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.
(2) As used in this subsection, “serious bodily injury” means physical injury that creates a
substantial risk of death or causes serious physical disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment
of the function of any bodily member or organ.
(d) Any person knowingly failing to stop or to comply with the requirements under
circumstances which result in the death of any person, shall upon conviction be punished pursuant
to the provisions of this subsection as follows:
(1) Every person convicted of a first violation of this subsection shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for not less than two (2) ten (10) years and for not more than fifteen
(15) years, in any unit of the adult correctional institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge,
by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000) nor more
than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), and his or her license to
operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked for a period of three (3) not less than ten (10) years and
not more than fifteen (15) years. The license privilege shall not be reinstated until evidence
satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles establishes that no grounds exist
which would authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the person gives proof of financial
LC004420 - Page 2 of 4

responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.
(2) Every person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this subsection within a
five (5) year period shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for not less than five (5)
ten (10) years and for not more than twenty (20) years, in any unit of the adult correctional
institutions in the discretion of the sentencing judge, by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and his or her license to operate a motor
vehicle shall be revoked for a period of not less than five (5) years ten (10) years and may be
permanently revoked. The If less than a permanent revocation is imposed the license privilege shall
not be reinstated until evidence satisfactory to the administrator of the division of motor vehicles
establishes that no grounds exist which would authorize the refusal to issue a license, and until the
person gives proof of financial responsibility pursuant to chapter 32 of this title.
(e) This section shall apply in its entirety to any driver of a motor vehicle knowingly
involved in an accident with a pedestrian or a person riding a bicycle.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004420
========
LC004420 - Page 3 of 4